Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.390

Bonds authorized.

The city council or other legislative body of any city may, in their discretion, provide by ordinance for the payment of the whole or any portion of the cost and expense of any local improvement authorized by law, by bonds of the improvement district, which bonds shall be issued and sold as herein provided.

[ 1915 c 154 s 10; 1907 c 153 s 47; RRS s 9262.]

NOTES:

Cities and towns: Title 35 RCW.

Public contracts and indebtedness: Title 39 RCW.